Wyoming, session 2025, HB0136.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-3-220(a)(ii), (b) and (c) is
amended to read:
9-3-220. Volunteer firefighters, volunteer emergency
medical technicians and volunteer search and rescue persons
participation in the state employees' and officials' group
insurance plan; requirements.
(a) Volunteer firefighters, emergency medical
technicians and volunteer search and rescue persons may
elect to participate in the state employees' and officials'
group insurance plan as defined by W.S. 9-3-203(a)(v) and
implemented under W.S. 9-3-202 through 9-3-219. These
volunteers are eligible to enroll in the group insurance
plan within the first thirty-one (31) days of the enactment
of this section or after initially volunteering for ninety
(90) days. After the ninety (90) day period is over, the
volunteer shall have thirty-one (31) days to enroll in the
group insurance plan. Eligible volunteers who elect not to
become enrolled within the time prescribed in this
subsection may be enrolled at a later date upon conditions
the department may impose. Continued participation in the
program is limited to a volunteer who:
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0136
ENROLLED ACT NO. 63, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Is not eligible for health insurance
coverage under a government sponsored health care program
excluding the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act,
P.L. 111-148, marketplace exchange; and
(b) Volunteer firefighters, volunteer emergency
medical technicians and volunteer search and rescue persons
participating in the state employees' and officials' group
insurance plan shall pay their group insurance be
responsible for submitting their monthly premiums in their
entirety and shall not benefit from to the department. An
employer, contributions to cover a portion of the cost of
their premiums. Volunteers shall submit their monthly
premiums to the fire department, emergency medical service
department or search and rescue department may elect to
contribute a portion of the cost of a volunteer's premium.
The procedure for submittal of premiums shall be
established by the department.
(c) Volunteer firefighters, volunteer emergency
medical technicians and volunteer search and rescue persons
participating in the state employees' and officials' group
insurance plan shall submit monthly annual verification of
their continued volunteer status to the department. The
verification shall be reviewed and signed by their
supervisor.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0136
ENROLLED ACT NO. 63, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3